Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4857
Attachment, garnishment, and levy of execution.

During the pendency in this or any other state of a liquidation proceeding, whether called by that name or not, no action or proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment, or levy of execution shall be commenced or maintained in this state against the delinquent insurer or its assets.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 57.